Wisconsin, session 2025, AB672.
do enact as follows:AB672,1Section 1. 165.27 of the statutes is created to read:165.27 Transnational repression training, prevention, and awareness. (1) In this section, “transnational repression” means an action taken by a person acting as an agent of or on behalf of a foreign government or foreign terrorist organization, outside of the jurisdiction of the government or organization, with the intent to harass, intimidate, silence, punish, or otherwise impose the foreign government’s or foreign terrorist organization’s control, preferences, viewpoints, or laws upon a dissident; exile; activist; journalist; political opponent; member of a religious, ethnic, or political minority group; or citizen of another country due to their political view.(2) The department of justice shall do all of the following:(a) Develop a training program for law enforcement officers on how to identify and respond to transnational repression.(b) Maintain a list of countries and foreign terrorist organizations that perpetrate transnational repression frequently, including how the countries and organizations perpetrate transnational repression.(c) Develop best practices for preventing transnational repression within local communities.(d) Develop a public awareness campaign to help individuals identify and report possible cases of transnational repression and to collect examples of cases from the public. The public awareness campaign shall include institutions of higher education with foreign student populations.(e) Create a digital portal on the department’s website for reporting suspected cases of transnational repression.(3) The department of justice shall submit a report annually to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) detailing identified cases of transnational repression.AB672,2Section 2. 939.64 of the statutes is created to read:939.64 Penalty enhancer; crime committed as act of transnational repression. (1) If a person commits, or solicits, conspires, or attempts under s. 939.30, 939.31, or 939.32 to commit, a crime under chs. 939 to 948, the classification for the underlying crime is increased as provided under sub. (2) if all of the following apply:(a) The action is taken by a person acting as an agent of or on behalf of a foreign government or foreign terrorist organization.(b) The action is taken with the intent to harass, intimidate, silence, punish, or otherwise impose the foreign government’s or foreign terrorist organization’s control, preferences, viewpoints, or laws upon a dissident; exile; activist; journalist; political opponent; member of a religious, ethnic, or political minority group; or citizen of another country due to their political view.(2) (a) If the underlying crime under sub. (1) is a Class B to I felony, the person is guilty of a felony that is one classification higher than the classification of the underlying crime.(b) If the underlying crime under sub. (1) is a Class A misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a Class I felony.(c) If the underlying crime under sub. (1) is a misdemeanor other than a Class A misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor that is one classification higher than the classification of the underlying crime.(3) This section provides for the enhancement of the penalties applicable for the underlying crime. The court shall direct that the trier of fact find a special verdict as to all of the elements specified in sub. (1).AB672,3Section 3. 946.685 of the statutes is created to read:946.685 Illegally enforcing foreign laws. (1) No person may intentionally engage in the prevention, detection, investigation, monitoring, surveilling, or prosecution of an offense under the law or rule of a foreign government or foreign terrorist organization at the direction of the foreign government or foreign terrorist organization without the prior approval of the federal government or a Wisconsin law enforcement agency with jurisdiction.(2) A person who violates sub. (1) is guilty of a Class E felony. If a person is convicted of a violation of sub. (1), the court shall impose a bifurcated sentence under s. 973.01. The term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated sentence shall be at least 3 years, and the person shall be fined at least $10,000. Otherwise the penalties for the crime apply, subject to any applicable penalty enhancement.AB672,4Section 4. 973.01 (2) (c) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:973.01 (2) (c) 2. a. Sections 939.621, 939.623, 939.632, 939.635, 939.64, 939.645, 946.42 (4), 961.442, 961.46, and 961.49. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab672 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab672 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB672 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB672 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB672: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting